Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2132
Certified professional counselor; qualifications.

A person shall be qualified to be a certified professional counselor if he or she:

(1) Has received a master's degree from an approved educational program;

(2) Has had three thousand hours of experience in professional counseling approved by the board after receipt of the master's degree; and

(3) Completes an application and satisfactorily passes an examination approved by the board.

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 91;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,269;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 44;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 104;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 162;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,325;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 749.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.